North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19B. The Secure and Fair Enforcement Mortgage Licensing Act.

§ 53-244.010.
Title.

This act may be cited as the “North Carolina Secure and Fair Enforcement (S.A.F.E.) Mortgage Licensing Act.”

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.020.
Purpose and construction.

Purpose. — A primary purpose of this Article is to protect consumers seeking mortgage loans and to ensure that the mortgage lending industry operates without unfair, deceptive, and fraudulent practices on the part of mortgage loan originators. Therefore, the General Assembly establishes within this Article an effective system of supervision and enforcement of the mortgage lending industry by giving the Commissioner of Banks broad administrative authority to administer, interpret, and enforce this Article and adopt rules implementing this Article in order to carry out the intentions of the General Assembly.

Construction. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that provisions of this Article be liberally construed to effect the purposes stated or clearly encompassed by the Article.

History.

2009-374, s. 2.

§ 53-244.030.
Definitions.

For purposes of the Article, the following definitions apply:

“Affiliate” means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company, as set forth in the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841, et seq.), as amended from time to time.

“Audited Statement of Financial Condition” means a statement of financial condition prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and certified by a certified public accountant as fairly and accurately reflecting financial condition of the licensee as of the date specified in the statement.

(2a)

“Banking Commission” means the North Carolina Banking Commission. For the purpose of complying with this Article by credit unions, Banking Commission means the North Carolina Credit Union Commission.

“Branch manager” means the individual who is assigned to, is in charge of, and is responsible for the business operations of a branch office of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender.

“Branch office” means an office of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender that is separate and distinct from the mortgage broker’s or lender’s principal office and from which its employees engage in the mortgage business. A branch office shall not be located at an individual’s home or residence.

“Certified Statement of Financial Condition” means a statement of financial condition prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and certified by the preparer or licensee as fairly and accurately reflecting the financial condition of the licensee as of the date specified in the statement.

“Commissioner” means the North Carolina Commissioner of Banks and the Commissioner’s designees. For the purpose of compliance with this Article by credit unions, Commissioner means the Administrator of the Credit Union Division of the Department of Commerce.

“Control” means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of a company, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise. Any person that (i) is a director, general partner, or executive officer; (ii) directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten percent (10%) or more of a class of voting security or has the power to sell or direct the sale of ten percent (10%) or more of a class of voting securities; (iii) in the case of a limited liability company, is a managing member; or (iv) in the case of a partnership, has the right to receive upon dissolution, or has contributed, ten percent (10%) or more of the capital, is presumed to control the company.

“Depository institution” has the same meaning as in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act and includes any credit union whose share and deposit accounts are insured by the National Credit Union Administration under the Federal Credit Union Act.

“Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, manufactured home, mobile home, or trailer if it is used as a residence.

“Employee” means an individual who has an employment relationship with a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer and who is treated as a common law employee for purposes of compliance with the federal income tax laws and whose income is reported on IRS Form W-2.

“Engaging in the mortgage business” means:

For compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain, either directly or indirectly, to accept or offer to accept an application for a residential mortgage loan from prospective borrowers, solicit or offer to solicit a residential mortgage loan from prospective borrowers, negotiate the terms or conditions of a residential mortgage loan with prospective borrowers, issue residential mortgage loan commitments or interest rate guarantee agreements to prospective borrowers, or engage in tablefunding of residential mortgage loans, whether any such acts are done through contact by telephone, by electronic means, by mail, or in person with the borrowers or prospective borrowers.

To make or fund, or offer to make or fund, or advance funds on residential mortgage loans for compensation or gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain.

To engage, whether for compensation or gain from another or on one’s own behalf, in the business of receiving any scheduled periodic payments from a borrower pursuant to the terms of any residential mortgage loan, including amounts for escrow accounts, and making the payments of principal and interest and such other payments with respect to the amounts received from the borrower as may be required pursuant to the terms of the residential mortgage loan, the residential mortgage loan servicing documents, or servicing contract, or otherwise to meet the definition of the term “servicer” in 12 U.S.C. § 2605(i)(2) with respect to residential mortgage loans.

(11a)

“Exclusive mortgage broker” means an individual who acts as a mortgage broker exclusively for a single mortgage lender or mortgage broker licensee or a single exempt mortgage lender and who is licensed pursuant to G.S. 53-244.050(b)(3). Unless otherwise indicated, an exclusive mortgage broker shall be subject to the requirements of a mortgage broker under this Article.

“Federal banking agencies” means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Office of Thrift Supervision, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild, or the spouse of an immediate family member. This term includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive relationships.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Licensee” means a mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer or other person who is licensed pursuant to this Article.

“Loan processor or underwriter” means an individual who performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed or exempt from licensing under this Article. Clerical or support duties may include, subsequent to the receipt of an application:

The receipt, collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan; and

Communicating with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms.

Any person who represents to the public, through advertising or other means of communication, or provides information, including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that the individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator shall not be deemed to be a loan processor or underwriter under this definition.

“Loss mitigation specialist” means an employee of a mortgage servicer authorized to (i) collect or receive payments, including payments of principal, interest, escrow amounts, and other amounts due on existing residential mortgage loans due and owing to the licensed lender or servicer when the borrower is in default or in reasonably foreseeable likelihood of default, (ii) work with the borrower to collect data, and (iii) make decisions necessary to modify, either temporarily or permanently, certain terms of those residential mortgage loans or to otherwise finalize collection through the foreclosure process. Such decisions shall include any change in the principal amount of the debt, the rate of annual interest charged, the term of the loan, the waiver of any fees or charges, including late charges, the deferral of payments, or any other similar matter.

“Make a residential mortgage loan” means to advance funds, to offer to advance funds, to make a commitment to advance funds to a borrower under a mortgage loan, or to fund a residential mortgage loan.

“Mortgage broker” means a person engaged in the mortgage business as defined in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (11) of this section.

“Mortgage lender” means a person engaged in the mortgage business as defined in sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (11) of this section. However, the definition does not include a person who acts as a mortgage lender only in a tablefunding transaction.

“Mortgage loan originator” means:

An individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain, whether through contact by telephone, by electronic means, by mail, or in person with prospective borrowers, either:

Takes a residential mortgage loan application or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan,

Accepts or offers to accept applications for mortgage loans,

Solicits or offers to solicit a mortgage loan,

Negotiates the terms or conditions of a mortgage loan, or

Issues mortgage loan commitments or interest rate guarantee agreements to prospective borrowers.

The term includes an individual acting solely as a loss mitigation specialist if the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development issues a guideline, rule, regulation, or interpretative letter that such individuals are loan originators as the term is defined by § 1503 of Title V of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, Public Law 110-289, and only to the extent of such an issuance or determination.

The term does not include:

An individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter;

A person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered as such in accordance with State law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a mortgage lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

A person or entity solely involved in extensions of credit or sale of timeshare instruments relating to timeshare plans, as that term is defined in G.S. 93A-41(37); or

An individual who only informs a prospective borrower of the availability of persons engaged in the mortgage business, does not take or assist in the completion of a loan application, and does not discuss specific terms or conditions of a mortgage loan. The taking of basic preapplication information for facilitating a residential mortgage loan transaction, such as the name and contact information of the prospective borrower, the prospective borrower’s own assessment of creditworthiness, desired loan types, and resources to make a down payment, but not including social security number, credit score, credit or employment history, or specific rates of a desired mortgage loan, to connect prospective borrowers to persons engaged in the mortgage business does not prevent an individual from qualifying for this exclusion.

An individual who is a salesperson for a licensed manufactured housing retailer that performs the purely administrative and clerical tasks of physically handling or transmitting to a licensed mortgage loan originator on behalf of a prospective borrower an application and other forms completed by the prospective borrower. Nothing in this subpart prohibits a salesperson, upon the written request of a mortgage loan originator and after a prospective borrower completes an application, from pulling and transmitting a credit report with the application.

(21a)

“Mortgage origination support registrant” or “registrant” means a person engaged exclusively in the processing or underwriting of residential mortgage loans and not engaged in the mortgage business.

“Mortgage servicer” means a person engaged in the mortgage business who directly or indirectly engages in the mortgage business as defined in sub-subdivision c. of subdivision (11) of this section.

“Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry” means the mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of licensed mortgage loan originators.

“Nontraditional mortgage product” means any residential mortgage loan product other than a 30-year fixed rate mortgage.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, corporation, association, or other group engaged in joint business activities however organized.

“Principal office” means a principal place of business that shall consist of at least one enclosed room or building of stationary construction in which negotiations of mortgage loan transactions may be conducted and carried on in privacy and in which all of the books, records, and files pertaining to mortgage loan transactions relating to borrowers in this State are maintained. A principal office shall not be located at an individual’s home or residence.

“Qualifying individual” means a person who meets the experience and other requirements of G.S. 53-244.050(b) and who agrees to be primarily responsible for the operations of a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender or mortgage servicer.

“Real estate brokerage activity” means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including:

Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;

Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property;

Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction;

Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate agent or real estate broker under Chapter 93A of the General Statutes; and

Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity, described in sub-subdivision a., b., c., or d. of this subdivision.

“Registered mortgage loan originator” means any individual who meets the definition of mortgage loan originator, is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and is an employee of:

A depository institution;

A subsidiary that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency; or

An institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration.

“Residential mortgage loan or mortgage loan” means any loan made or represented to be made to a natural person or persons primarily for personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling located within this State or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“Residential real estate” means any real property located in this State upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.

“RESPA” means the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, 12 U.S.C. § 2601, et seq., as it may be hereafter amended.

“Tablefunding” means a transaction in which a person closes a residential mortgage loan in its own name but with funds provided by another and in which the loan is assigned to the mortgage lender actually providing the funds within one business day of the funding of the loan.

(33a)

“Transitional mortgage loan originator” means an individual who is authorized to act as a mortgage loan originator subject to a transitional mortgage loan originator license which is limited to a term of no more than 120 days and is not subject to reapplication, renewal, or extension by the Commissioner.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2009-570, s. 34.1; 2013-327, s. 1; 2015-293, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 2(b).

§ 53-244.040.
License and registration requirements.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no person may engage in the mortgage business or act as a mortgage loan originator with respect to any dwelling located in this State without first obtaining and maintaining a license under this Article. It shall be unlawful for any person, other than an exempt person or a person licensed as a transitional mortgage loan originator, to act as a mortgage loan originator without a mortgage loan originator license, which authorizes an individual who is employed by a licensee holding a license as provided in subsection (b) of this section to conduct the business of a mortgage loan originator.

(a1)

In anticipation of satisfaction of all requirements necessary to obtain a license as a mortgage loan originator under this Article, a transitional mortgage loan originator license may be granted to an individual who has an active license to originate mortgage loans pursuant to the laws of any state or territory of the United States other than North Carolina, provided the individual registers, is fingerprinted, and maintains a unique identifier with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry at the time the individual submits a transitional mortgage loan originator application to the Commissioner. A transitional mortgage loan originator license may also be issued to a registered loan originator for the purpose of satisfying all requirements necessary to obtain a license as a mortgage loan originator under this Article if permitted by a guideline, rule, regulation, or interpretive letter which clarifies section 1503 of Title V of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, P.L. 110-289, and only to the extent of such an issuance or determination.

Four types of licenses are granted to entities under this Article, and it shall be unlawful for any person, other than an exempt person, to engage in the mortgage business without one of the following licenses:

A mortgage broker license authorizes a person to act as a mortgage broker as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(19).

A mortgage lender license authorizes a person to act as a mortgage lender as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(20), a mortgage broker as defined under G.S. 53-244.030(19), and upon notice to the Commissioner, a mortgage servicer as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(22).

A mortgage servicer license authorizes a person to act only as a mortgage servicer as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(22).

An exclusive mortgage broker license authorizes a person to act as an exclusive mortgage broker as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(11a).

Each mortgage loan originator and person engaged in the mortgage business must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(c1)

A registrant operating in this State must register with the Commissioner. Upon issuance of the registration, a registrant is authorized to sponsor and employ licensed mortgage loan originators or transitional mortgage loan originators to control and supervise the registrant’s loan processors or underwriters in accordance with Title V of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, P.L. 110-289, and 24 C.F.R. 3400. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing a registrant to engage in the mortgage business.

The following are exempt from all provisions of this Article except the provisions of

G.S. 53-244.111

:

Registered mortgage loan originators as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(29);

Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual when making the family member a residential mortgage loan;

Any individual seller who offers or negotiates terms and makes a residential mortgage loan secured by the dwelling that served as the selling individual’s residence;

An attorney licensed pursuant to Chapter 84 of the General Statutes who negotiates the terms of a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client in the course of and incident to the attorney’s representation of the client, so long as the attorney does not hold himself out as engaged in the mortgage business and is not compensated by a mortgage lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator when negotiating the terms of a residential mortgage loan;

Any entity described in G.S. 53-244.030(29)a., b., or c., upon acceptance of the notice of exemption filed with the Commissioner as specified in G.S. 53-244.050(g);

Any officer or employee of an entity described in subdivision (5) of this subsection when acting within the scope of his or her employment;

A State or federally chartered credit union, upon filing of a notice of exemption with the Administrator of the Credit Union Division of the Department of Commerce as specified in G.S. 53-244.050(g); or

Any person who, as seller, receives in one calendar year no more than five residential mortgage loans as security for purchase money obligations, unless the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development has expressly and definitively determined that such persons are loan originators as the term is defined by § 1503 of Title V of the Housing and Economic Recovery Act of 2008, Public Law 110-289, and such determination is in effect on July 31, 2010.

Each mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article, or registrant registered under this Article, shall have a qualifying individual who operates the business under that person’s full charge, control, and supervision. Each mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article, or registrant registered under this Article, shall file through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry a form acceptable to the Commissioner indicating the licensee’s designation of a qualifying individual and each qualifying individual’s acceptance of the responsibility. Each mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer licensed under this Article, or registrant registered under this Article, shall notify the Commissioner within 15 days of any change in its designated qualifying individual. Any individual licensee who operates as a sole proprietorship shall qualify as and be considered the qualifying individual for the purposes of this subsection.

Mortgage lenders and mortgage brokers may not operate branch offices, except as permitted by this Article. Each principal office and each branch office of a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this Article shall have a branch manager who meets the experience requirements under G.S. 53-244.050(b). The qualifying individual for a licensee’s business also may serve as the branch manager of one of the licensee’s branch offices. Each mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this Article shall file through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry a form acceptable to the Commissioner indicating the licensee’s designation of branch manager for each branch. Each mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this Article shall notify the Commissioner within 15 days of the change of any branch manager.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2009-570, s. 48; 2013-327, s. 2; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 48, effective August 28, 2009, transferred “or” from the end of subdivision (d)(6) to (d)(7) and made minor stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 2, effective September 1, 2013, in subsection (a), added “or a person licensed as a transitional mortgage loan originator” and made a minor punctuation change; and added subsection (a1). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, added subsection (c1); and inserted “or registrant registered under this Article” three times in subsection (e). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.050.
License and registration application; claim of exemption.

Applicants for a license or registration shall apply through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry on a form acceptable to the Commissioner, including the following information:

The applicant’s name and address, including street address, mailing address, e-mail, telephone contact information, and social security number or taxpayer identification number.

The applicant’s form and place of organization, if applicable.

The applicant’s proposed method of and locations for doing business, if applicable.

The qualifications and business history of the applicant and, if applicable, the business history of any partner, officer, or director, any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or indirectly controlling the applicant, including:

A description of any injunction or administrative order by any state or federal authority to which the person is or has been subject;

Any conviction, within the past 10 years, of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or any fraud, false statement or omission, any theft or wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, or involving any financial service or financial service- related business; and

Any felony convictions.

With respect to an application for licensing as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer, the applicant’s financial condition, credit history, and business history, and, with respect to an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant’s credit history and business history.

The applicant’s consent to a federal and State criminal history record check and a set of the applicant’s fingerprints in a form acceptable to the Commissioner. In the case of an applicant that is a person other than a natural person, each individual who has control of the applicant or who is the qualifying individual or a branch manager shall consent to a federal and State criminal history record check and submit a set of that individual’s fingerprints pursuant to this subdivision.

The eligibility requirements for an application for licensure or registration under this Article are as follows:

Each individual applicant for licensure as a mortgage loan originator or qualifying individual shall:

Be at least 18 years of age;

Have satisfactorily completed, within the three years immediately preceding the date of application, the mortgage lending prelicensing education as required under

G.S. 53-244.070

; and

Have passed, within the five years immediately preceding the date of application, the test required under

G.S. 53-244.080

.

(1a)

Each individual applicant for licensure as a transitional mortgage loan originator shall:

a.

Be at least 18 years of age;

b.

Have an active license to originate mortgage loans pursuant to the laws of any state or territory of the United States other than North Carolina or be a registered loan originator;

c.

Have a valid unique identifier, registration, and fingerprints on file with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

Have been employed for a period of no less than two years as a mortgage loan originator; and

Have provided certification of employment with a mortgage lender or mortgage broker licensed under this Article, including an attestation by the employer that the applicant is in his or her employ.

Each applicant for licensure as a mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer, or registration as a registrant, at the time of application shall comply with the following requirements:

If the applicant is a sole proprietor, the applicant shall have at least three years of experience in residential mortgage lending or other experience or meet competency requirements as the Commissioner may impose.

If the applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, general or limited partnership, association, or other group engaged in a joint enterprise, however organized, at least one of its principal officers, managers, or general partners shall have three years of experience in residential mortgage lending or other experience or meet competency requirements as the Commissioner may impose.

If the applicant will be a qualifying individual or branch manager, the applicant shall have at least three years of experience in residential mortgage lending or other experience or meet competency requirements as the Commissioner may impose.

If an individual applicant to be licensed as a mortgage broker is a licensed mortgage loan originator and meets the requirements for licensure as a mortgage broker, but is not an employee as defined in G.S. 53-244.030(10) and does not meet the experience requirements of G.S. 53-244.050(b)(2)a., the individual may be licensed as an exclusive mortgage broker upon compliance with all of the following:

Successfully completes the prelicensing education required under

G.S. 53-244.070

.

Acts exclusively as a mortgage broker and shall be an agent for a single mortgage lender or mortgage broker licensee or a single exempt mortgage lender, who:

Shall be responsible for supervising the broker as required by this Article and in accordance with a plan of supervision approved by the Commissioner in the Commissioner’s discretion;

Shall sign the license application of the applicant; and

Shall be jointly and severally liable with the broker for any claims arising from the broker’s mortgage brokering activities.

Shall be compensated on a basis that is not dependent upon the interest rate, fees, or other terms of the loan brokered, provided that this sub-subdivision shall not prohibit compensation based on the principal balance of the loan.

Shall offer only fixed-term, fixed-rate, fully amortizing mortgage loans originated by a single mortgage lender with substantially equal monthly mortgage payments and without a prepayment penalty, unless the Commissioner shall approve, in the Commissioner’s discretion, the sale of other mortgage loan products for that lender.

Shall not handle borrower or other third-party funds in connection with the brokering or closing of mortgage loans.

Shall meet the surety bond requirement of a mortgage broker or otherwise be covered by a surety bond provided by the mortgage lender or broker licensee or exempt mortgage lender of the lesser of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or an amount equal to or greater than the sum of the surety bond requirements for each exclusive mortgage broker supervised by the broker or lender.

In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, transitional mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage servicer, or registration as a registrant, the applicant and its owners, qualifying individual, and controlling persons shall furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal history background check.

Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the Commissioner to obtain:

Independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

The personal history may be obtained by the Commissioner at any time and the fingerprint information shall be furnished upon the Commissioner’s request.

An authorization for the Commissioner to obtain personal history or fingerprint information at any time.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact that the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of the criminal information required by this section, the Commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department of Public Safety or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact that the Commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of the noncriminal information required by this section, the Commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the Commissioner.

For purposes of this section, the Commissioner may request and the North Carolina Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the Commissioner for any person who (i) has applied for or holds a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, mortgage loan originator, or transitional mortgage loan originator license as provided by this section or (ii) has applied for or holds a registration as a registrant under this section. The Commissioner shall provide the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of the person, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the person consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The person’s fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Department of Public Safety may charge a fee for each person for conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this section.

Except as provided by subsection (h) of this section, persons engaged in the mortgage business and exempt from licensure pursuant to G.S. 53-244.040(d)(5) shall notify the Commissioner in order to claim and confirm the exemption and to facilitate the referral of consumers that contact the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall prescribe a form for such a claim of exemption that shall contain:

The name of the exempt person;

The basis of the exempt status of the exempt person;

The principal business address and contact information for the exempt person; and

The State or federal regulatory authority responsible for the exempt person’s supervision, examination, or regulation.

A State or federally chartered credit union may claim and confirm an exemption from this Article by notifying the Administrator of the Credit Union Division of the Department of Commerce and providing substantially the same information required by subsection (g) of this section.

The Commissioner shall keep all information pursuant to this section privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2013-327, s. 3; 2013-412, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o); 2014-115, s. 39; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 3, effective September 1, 2013, added subdivision (b)(1a); inserted “transitional mortgage loan originator,” in subsection (c); and, in the first sentence of subsection (f), added “or transitional mortgage loan originator” and made a minor stylistic change. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-412, s. 1, effective August 23, 2013, substituted “five” for “three” in sub-subdivision (b)(1)c.; and deleted “a 16-hour residential mortgage lending course approved by the Commissioner supplementing” following “completes” in sub-subdivision (b)(3)a.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(o), effective July 7, 2014, substituted “Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Justice” in subsections (d) and (f).

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 39, effective August 11, 2014, added “or be a registered loan originator” in sub-subdivision (b)(1a)b.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, inserted “or registration” in the introductory language of subsections (a) and (b); substituted “mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or mortgage servicer, or registration as a registrant” for “mortgage broker or mortgage lender or mortgage servicer” in the introductory language of subdivision (b)(2); inserted “or registration as a registrant” in the introductory language of subsection (c); and added clause (ii) in the first sentence of subsection (f). For applicability, see editor’s note.